Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AT-RISK YOUTH IN ROCHESTER, ST. CLOUD, AND EXCELSIOR.new text end new text begin $375,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs to award grants of $125,000 each fiscal year to 180 Degrees in the Rochester regional area, St. Cloud regional area, and central Minnesota region west of the Twin Cities to address racial disparities of youth using shelter services. The 180 Degrees shelters in each region shall establish and operate a program connected to shelter services to engage in community outreach, mobile case management, family reunification, aftercare, and follow up when family members are released from shelter services. This program shall specifically address the large geographic rural areas served where at-risk youth enter shelters in Rochester, St. Cloud, and Excelsior. new text end